test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-glossing.yaml
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: bagwaaniignoonymishan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymishing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymishan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: bagwaaniignoonsmishan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmishing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonyminaanba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonyminaandig
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonsminaanba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsminaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonyminaanba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyminaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonymiwaaba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymiwaadig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonsminaanba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsminaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonsmiwaaba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmiwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: bagwaaniignoonymiwaaba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymiwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: bagwaaniignoonyminwiba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyminwidig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaaba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsminwiba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsminwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nbagwaaniignoonyminaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonyminaaning
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonyminaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nbagwaaniignoonsminaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsminaaning
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsminaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonyminaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonyminaaning
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyminaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonymiwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonymiwaang
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymiwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonsminaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsminaaning
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsminaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonsmiwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsmiwaang
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: bagwaaniignoonymiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymiwaang
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+4: bagwaaniignoonyminwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyminiing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyminwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaang
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+4: bagwaaniignoonsminwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsminiing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsminwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonymibniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonymibniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonymibniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsmibniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonymibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonymibniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsmibniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonymibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonymibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymibniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmibniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaanba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaandig
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaanba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaanba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaaba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaadig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaanba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaaba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaaba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt: bagwaaniignoonyshinwiba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshinwidig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaaba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsshinwiba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaaning
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonyshinaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaaning
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsshinaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaaning
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyshinaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaang
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyshiwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaaning
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsshinaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaang
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsshiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaang
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+4: bagwaaniignoonyshinwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyshiniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshinwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaang
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshiwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: bagwaaniignoonsshinwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsshiniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonyshibniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsshibniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonyshibniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsshibniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyshibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsshibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyshibniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyshibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsshibniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsshibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonynaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonynaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonynaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonsnaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsnaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonynaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonynaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonynaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonywaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonywaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonywaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsnaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsnaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonswaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonswaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonswaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonywaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonywaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonywaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonyniwbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonyniwbaniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyniwbaniin
